Massachusetts, session 194th, S84.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
(a) The cannabis control commission, in consultation with the cannabis advisory board,
the cannabis social equity advisory board, the department of correction, the Massachusetts
sheriffs association, the office of probation, the university of Massachusetts, the executive office
of economic development, and the executive office of labor and workforce development shall: (i)
conduct a study on programs and partnerships to encourage the employment of justice-involved
individuals in the cannabis industry, including training and educational programs conducted
within houses of correction, jails and prisons, as a part of probation or parole, and after release,
and report the findings of that study no later than Dec. 31, 2026; and (ii) develop a pilot program
to create career pathways in the cannabis industry for incarcerated individuals, individuals on
probation and parole, and formerly justice-involved individuals no later than Dec. 31, 2027.
of 1